Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-811
Apartments; conveyance; legal description.

Each apartment in a building shall be designated, on the plans referred to in section 76-810, by letter or number or other appropriate designation, and any conveyance or other instrument affecting title to the apartment which describes the apartment by using the letter or number followed by the words in .......... Condominium Property Regime shall be deemed to contain a good and sufficient description for all purposes. Any conveyance of an individual apartment shall be deemed to also convey the undivided interest of the owner in the common elements, both general and limited, appertaining to the apartment without specifically or particularly referring to same. For condominiums created in this state before January 1, 1984, the provisions on the description of the apartments or units in section 76-841 shall apply to the extent necessary in construing the provisions of sections 76-827, 76-829 to 76-831, 76-840, 76-841, 76-869, 76-874, 76-876, 76-884, and 76-891.01, and subdivisions (a)(1) to (a)(6) and (a)(11) to (a)(16) of section 76-860 which apply to events and circumstances which occur after January 1, 1984.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 11, p. 1440;

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 76;

Laws 1993, LB 478, § 5.